02_Morphology/arn1.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>       ! Nombre
%<cmp%>     ! Composición
%<2n%>      ! Two Nouns
%<3n%>      ! Three Nouns
%>          ! Frontera de morfema
%+          ! Frontera de palabras compuestas (forma léxica)
%#          ! Frontera de palabras compuestas (forma superficial)


LEXICON Root

Nouns  ;

LEXICON Cmp

%<cmp%>%2n:%# Nouns ;   ! Compound with two nouns
%<cmp%>%3n:%# Nouns ;   ! Compound with three nouns

LEXICON N

%<n%>:%2n Cmp ;  ! Link to compound with two nouns
%<n%>:%3n Cmp ;  ! Link to compound with three nouns
%<n%>: # ;

LEXICON Nouns

mapu:mapu N ; !"tierra, land"
che:che N ; ! "gente, people"
mamüll:mamüll N ; ! "madera, wood"
wangku:wangku N ; ! "silla, chair"
